District of Columbia statutes.
5-723.02

Longevity compensation.

The additional compensation provided for in § 5-544.01, shall be included for purposes of retirement annuity calculations pursuant to this subchapter for those officers and members who complete 25 years of active service prior to retirement.

Sept. 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 718, ch. 433, § 12(n-2)
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 13(i), 52 DCR 2638
For temporary addition of the Act of Sept. 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 718, ch. 433, §§ 12(n-3), 12(n-4), and 12(n-5), concerning required minimum distributions, disposition of forfeitures, and funds not assignable or subject to execution, see § 2(f) of the Police and Firefighter’s Retirement and Disability Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-585, January 1, 2013, 60 DCR 151).